prince/dictionaries/ca.aff
# Verbs en -ir, formes comunes als grups III, IV i V
SFX M Y 106
SFX M   iré    im          [^aeiou]iré      # 4. patim       <IPR>
SFX M   iré    im          [gq]uiré         #    seguim
SFX M   iré    ïm          [^gq]uiré        #    induïm
SFX M   iré    ïm          [aeio]iré        #    traïm
SFX M   iré    iu          [^aeiou]iré      # 5. patiu
SFX M   iré    iu          [gq]uiré         #    seguiu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [^gq]uiré        #    induïu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [aeio]iré        #    traïu
SFX M   iré    ia          [^aeiou]iré      # 1. patia       <IIM>
SFX M   iré    ia          [gq]uiré         #    seguia
SFX M   iré    ïa          [^gq]uiré        #    induïa
SFX M   iré    ïa          [aeio]iré        #    traïa
SFX M   iré    ies         [^aeiou]iré      # 2. paties
SFX M   iré    ies         [gq]uiré         #    seguies
SFX M   iré    ïes         [^gq]uiré        #    induïes
SFX M   iré    ïes         [aeio]iré        #    traïes
SFX M   iré    ia          [^aeiou]iré      # 3. patia
SFX M   iré    ia          [gq]uiré         #    seguia
SFX M   iré    ïa          [^gq]uiré        #    induïa
SFX M   iré    ïa          [aeio]iré        #    traïa
SFX M   iré    íem         iré              # 4. patíem, traíem
SFX M   iré    íeu         iré              # 5. patíeu, traíeu
SFX M   iré    ien         [^aeiou]iré      # 6. patien
SFX M   iré    ien         [gq]uiré         #    seguien
SFX M   iré    ïen         [^gq]uiré        #    induïen
SFX M   iré    ïen         [aeio]iré        #    traïen
SFX M   iré    í           iré              # 1. patí        <IPE>
SFX M   iré    ires        [^aeiou]iré      # 2. patires
SFX M   iré    ires        [gq]uiré         #    seguires
SFX M   iré    ïres        [^gq]uiré        #    induïres
SFX M   iré    ïres        [aeio]iré        #    traïres
SFX M   iré    í           iré              # 3. patí
SFX M   iré    írem        iré              # 4. patírem, traírem
SFX M   iré    íreu        iré              # 5. patíreu, traíreu
SFX M   iré    iren        [^aeiou]iré      # 6. patiren
SFX M   iré    iren        [gq]uiré         #    seguiren
SFX M   iré    ïren        [^gq]uiré        #    induïren
SFX M   iré    ïren        [aeio]iré        #    traïren
SFX M   iré    iré         iré              # 1. patiré, trairé <FUT>
SFX M   iré    iràs        iré              # 2. patiràs, trairàs
SFX M   iré    irà         iré              # 3. patirà, trairà
SFX M   iré    irem        iré              # 4. patirem, trairem
SFX M   iré    ireu        iré              # 5. patireu, traireu
SFX M   iré    iran        iré              # 6. patiran, trairan
SFX M   iré    iria        iré              # 1. patiria, trairia <CON>
SFX M   iré    iries       iré              # 2. patiries, trairies
SFX M   iré    iria        iré              # 3. patiria, trairia
SFX M   iré    iríem       iré              # 4. patiríem, trairíem
SFX M   iré    iríeu       iré              # 5. patiríeu, trairíeu
SFX M   iré    irien       iré              # 6. patirien, trairien
SFX M   iré    im          [^aeiou]iré      # 4. patim       <SPR>
SFX M   iré    im          [gq]uiré         #    seguim
SFX M   iré    ïm          [^gq]uiré        #    induïm
SFX M   iré    ïm          [aeio]iré        #    traïm
SFX M   iré    iu          [^aeiou]iré      # 5. patiu
SFX M   iré    iu          [gq]uiré         #    seguiu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [^gq]uiré        #    induïu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [aeio]iré        #    traïu
SFX M   iré    ís          iré              # 1. patís       <SIM>
SFX M   iré    ira         [^aeiou]iré      #    patira
SFX M   iré    ira         [gq]uiré         #    seguira
SFX M   iré    ïra         [^gq]uiré        #    induïra
SFX M   iré    ïra         [aeio]iré        #    traïra
SFX M   iré    issis       [^aeiou]iré      # 2. patissis
SFX M   iré    issis       [gq]uiré         #    seguissis
SFX M   iré    ïssis       [^gq]uiré        #    induïssis
SFX M   iré    ïssis       [aeio]iré        #    traïssis
SFX M   iré    isses       [^aeiou]iré      #    patisses
SFX M   iré    isses       [gq]uiré         #    seguisses
SFX M   iré    ïsses       [^gq]uiré        #    induïsses
SFX M   iré    ïsses       [aeio]iré        #    traïsses
SFX M   iré    ires        [^aeiou]iré      #    patires
SFX M   iré    ires        [gq]uiré         #    seguires
SFX M   iré    ïres        [^gq]uiré        #    induïres
SFX M   iré    ïres        [aeio]iré        #    traïres
SFX M   iré    ís          iré              # 3. patís
SFX M   iré    ira         [^aeiou]iré      #    patira
SFX M   iré    ira         [gq]uiré         #    seguira
SFX M   iré    ïra         [^gq]uiré        #    induïra
SFX M   iré    ïra         [aeio]iré        #    traïra
SFX M   iré    íssim       iré              # 4. patíssim
SFX M   iré    íssem       iré              #    patíssem
SFX M   iré    írem        iré              #    patírem
SFX M   iré    íssiu       iré              # 5. patíssiu
SFX M   iré    ísseu       iré              #    patísseu
SFX M   iré    íreu        iré              #    patíreu
SFX M   iré    issin       [^aeiou]iré      # 6. patissin
SFX M   iré    issin       [gq]uiré         #    seguissin
SFX M   iré    ïssin       [^gq]uiré        #    induïssin
SFX M   iré    ïssin       [aeio]iré        #    traïssin
SFX M   iré    issen       [^aeiou]iré      #    patissen
SFX M   iré    issen       [gq]uiré         #    seguissen
SFX M   iré    ïssen       [^gq]uiré        #    induïssen
SFX M   iré    ïssen       [aeio]iré        #    traïssen
SFX M   iré    iren        [^aeiou]iré      #    patiren
SFX M   iré    iren        [gq]uiré         #    seguiren
SFX M   iré    ïren        [^gq]uiré        #    induïren
SFX M   iré    ïren        [aeio]iré        #    traïren
SFX M   iré    im          [^aeiou]iré      # 4. patim       <IMP>
SFX M   iré    im          [gq]uiré         #    seguim
SFX M   iré    ïm          [^gq]uiré        #    induïm
SFX M   iré    ïm          [aeio]iré        #    traïm
SFX M   iré    iu          [^aeiou]iré      # 5. patiu
SFX M   iré    iu          [gq]uiré         #    seguiu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [^gq]uiré        #    induïu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [aeio]iré        #    traïu
